Maine, session 132, LD12.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. Legislative caucus. "Legislative caucus" means 3 or more Legislators of the
same political party meeting for the purpose of conducting legislative business on behalf
of the Legislature or a legislative committee.
Sec. 2. 1 MRSA §402, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1975, c. 758, is amended to
read:
A. The Legislature of Maine and its committees and, subcommittees and legislative
caucuses;